Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 7, 1st
Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2023 (73 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section
187A-5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 187A-5. A. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is
authorized to utilize available funds from the Legacy Capital
Financing Fund created by Enrolled House Bill No. 1002 of the 1st
Extraordinary Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature Section 187B
of this title, in the amounts of:
1. Seventy Million Dollars ($70,000,000.00) for the benefit of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to repair,

refurbish, and improve the real and personal property of the Jim
Thorpe Office Building; and
2. Nineteen Million Dollars ($19,000,000.00) for the benefit of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to repair,
refurbish, and improve the real and personal property constituting
the tunnels underlying the State Capitol Office Complex and
associated fixtures and equipment; and
3. Twenty-six Million Three Hundred Twenty-two Thousand Three
Hundred Dollars ($26,322,300.00) Forty-five Million Three Hundred
Twenty-two Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($45,322,300.00) for the
benefit of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to
accept transfer of the Kelley Building and Kelley Annex owned by the
Department of Human Services and renovate the facilities for lease
to a public operator as a day care facility.
B. LCF Recapitalization Payments shall be made related to the
distribution of proceeds provided in subsection A of this section,
in accordance with the provisions of the Legacy Capital Financing
Act.
C. The Authority may distribute funds authorized pursuant to
subsection A of this section in one or more tranches.
D. The Authority may enter memoranda of understanding with
agencies, departments, and subdivisions of the state as needed, to
facilitate the provisions of this act, provided that such memoranda
of understanding do not constitute a legal obligation of the State
of Oklahoma or impede the administration of the provisions of the
Legacy Capital Financing Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2776 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2776 Page 3